Washington statutes.
RCW 35.89.100

Water systems—What included.

The term "water system" as used in this chapter shall include and be applicable to all reservoirs, storage and clarifying tanks, conduits, mains, laterals, pipes, hydrants and other equipment used or constructed for the purpose of supplying water for public or domestic use, and shall include not only water systems constructed by local improvement districts, but also any system with which the same may be incorporated or connected.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.89.100. Prior: 1923 c 52 s 10; RRS s 9154-10.]